District of Columbia statutes.
9-204.01

Scope of Council’s authority.

Any proposed designation or change of the name of any public space or commemorative work on public space in the District of Columbia shall require approval by the Mayor and the Council as follows:

(1)

The Mayor may submit a resolution to the Council proposing a designation, change of name, or commemorative work for the Council’s approval.

(2)

A Council member may introduce an act proposing a designation, change of name, or commemorative work.

(3)

In accordance with paragraph (4) of this subsection, the Council may approve legislation submitted pursuant to paragraphs (1) or (2) of this subsection following a public hearing held by the Council and in accordance with the criteria set forth in this subchapter.

(4)

For commemorative works, the criteria set forth in part B of this subchapter shall be met prior to Council approval.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 401, 30 DCR 148
Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-275, § 2(c), 48 DCR 1660

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-301.01, § 9-204.16, § 9-204.17, § 9-204.19, and § 10-1805.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-451.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-275 rewrote the section which had read:
“The Council may name or change the name of any public street, alley, circle, bridge, building, park, or other public place or property referred to in this subchapter as ”public space“ in the District of Columbia.”

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) designation of street, see § 4 of Harris/Hinton Place and Bishop Samuel Kesley Way Designation Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-235, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4148).
For temporary (225 day) renaming of recreation center, see §§ 2,3 of Harry L. Thomas, Sr., Recreation Center Designation Temporary Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-134, June 24, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 5518).
For temporary (225 day) designation of street, see § 2 of Bishop Samuel Kelsey Way Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-223, April 3, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 3465).
For temporary (225 day) designation of street, see § 2 of Cady’s Alley Designation Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-244, March 25, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2757).
Section 2 of D.C. Law 18-143 amended section 2(2) of D.C. Law 16-52 by deleting “and the adjacent north-south portion of Champlain Street, N.W., that intersects Florida Avenue, N.W., between Square 2558 and 2562”.
Section 4(a) of D.C. Law 18-143 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-57 added a section to read as follows: “Sec. 2. Pursuant to sections 401 and 403a of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a) (”Act“), and notwithstanding the second sentence in section 403a and section 407 of the Act (D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.03a and 9-204.07), the Council symbolically designates the public street starting on the corner of Martin Luther King, Jr., Avenue, S.E., and Good Hope Road, S.E., moving across the 11th Street Bridge, across the Southeast Freeway, across the Southwest Freeway, onto Maine Avenue, S.W., and ending on the corner of 23rd Street, S.W., and Independence Avenue, S.W., as ‘Martin Luther King, Jr., Drive’.”
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 19-57 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Temporary Enactment Section 3(b) of D.C. Law 18-272 added provisions relating to the dedication of a portion of Ingraham Street, N.E. to read as follows:
“(b) The Council’s acceptance of the dedication of land described in subsection (a) of this section is contingent upon the filing of the dedication plat in the Office of the Surveyor.”
Section 6(b) of D.C. Law 18-272 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary designation of minor street as “Harry Thomas Way”, see § 2(b) of the Dedication and Designation of Harry Thomas Way Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-579, January 12, 1999, 45 DCR 966).
For designation of certain dedicated land, see § 2(b) of the Dedication and Designation of Harry Thomas Way, N.E. Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-198, December 1, 1999, 46 DCR 10444).
For designation of certain dedicated land, see § 2(b) of the Dedication and Designation of Harry Thomas Way, N.E. Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-277, March 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2017).
For temporary (90 day) renaming of the Langley-McKinley Recreation Center as the Harry L. Thomas, Sr., Recreation Center, see § 2 of the Harry L. Thomas, Sr., Recreation Center Designation Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-292, February 23, 2000, 47 DCR 2061).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Bishop Samuel Kelsey Way Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-472, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9642).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the John T. ‘Big John’ Williams Building Designation Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-529, January 11, 2001, 48 DCR 644).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of the Commemorative Works on Public Space Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-564, January 31, 2001, 48 DCR 1627).
For temporary (90 day) designation of Cady’s Alley, see § 2 of Cady’s Alley Designation Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-505, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 10041).
For temporary (90 day) closing of a drainage alley and portions of Burns Place, S.E., see § 2(c) of Closing of a Drainage Alley and Portions of Burns Place, S.E., and C Street, S.E., and the Dedication of Burns Court, S.E., Bay Lane, S.E., and Cape Drive, S.E., (S.O. 01-2143), Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-607, January 7, 2003, 50 DCR 695).
For temporary (90 day) designation of the William H. Rumsey, Sr. Aquatic Center, see § 2 of William H. Rumsey, Sr. Designation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-18, February 24, 2003, 50 DCR 1950).
For temporary (90 day) dedication, see § 3 of Closing, Dedication, and Designation of Public Streets and Alleys in Squares 5246, 5273, 5277, 5279, 5280, and 5281, S.O. 02-4088, Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-65, April 20, 2005, 52 DCR 4138).
For temporary (90 day) designation of dedicated streets, see §§ 4 and 5 of Closing, Dedication, and Designation of Public Streets and Alleys in Squares 5318, 5319, and 5320 Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-419, July 18, 2006, 53 DCR 6161).
For temporary (90 day) designation of dedicated streets, see §§ 3 and 4 of Dedication of Public Streets and Alleys in Squares 5318, 5319, and 5320 Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-497, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8840).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Gerald W. Burke, Junior Building Designation Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-352, April 17, 2008, 55 DCR 5368).
For temporary (90 day) designation of dedicated streets, see §§ 2 and 3 of Old Morgan School Place, N.W. Renaming Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-284, January 22, 2010, 57 DCR 1171).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 3 of Closing of Public Streets and a Public Alley and Dedication and Designation of Land for Street Purposes in Squares 3765, 3767, 3768, and 3769 Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-510, July 30, 2010, 57 DCR 7590).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2 of Martin Luther King, Jr., Drive Designation Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-130, August 1, 2011, 58 DCR 6787).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2 of Second Rita B. Bright Family and Youth Center Designation Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-160, October 11, 2011, 58 DCR 8886).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2 of Second Park at LeDroit Designation Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-162, October 11, 2011, 58 DCR 8890).

Resolutions

Resolution 15-580, the “September 11 Memorial Grove on Kingman Island Approval Resolution of 2004”, was approved effective June 29, 2004.

Editor's Notes

Designation of Raoul Wallenberg Place: Section 132 of H.R. 3067, amended by H.R. 99-419, incorporated in Pub. L. 99-190 by § 101(c), the D.C. Appropriation Act, 1986, provided that the portion of 15th Street, Southwest, located between Maine and Independence Avenues shall hereafter be known and designated as “Raoul Wallenberg Place”, and any law, regulation, map, document or other record of the United States and the District of Columbia which refers to that portion of such street shall be deemed to refer to “Raoul Wallenberg Place”.

Erection of signs at Sakharov Plaza: Section 132 of § 101(d) of Pub. L. 99-591, the D.C. Appropriation Act, 1987, provided that the District of Columbia shall construct three signs which contain the words, “Sakharov Plaza”. These signs shall be placed immediately above existing signs on the corners of 16th and L and 16th and M Streets, Northwest. These should be similar to signs used by the city to designate the location of Metro stations. In addition, a sign shall be placed on city property directly adjacent to, or directly in front of, 1125 16th Street designating the actual location of Andrei Sakharov Plaza. Hereafter the proper address of the Soviet Embassy in Washington, District of Columbia, shall be No. 1 Andrei Sakharov Plaza.

Designation of Carlos Manuel Rosario Adult Education Center: Section 3 of D.C. Law 8-177 provided that, pursuant to § 9-204.01, the Council hereby renames the adult education center presently known as the Gordon Adult Education Center as the “Carlos Manuel Rosario Adult Education Center”. Section 4 of D.C. Law 8-177 provided that after October 2, 1990, the Surveyor of the District of Columbia shall record in the Office of the Surveyor “Carlos Manuel Rosario Adult Education Center” as the name of the adult education center located at 35th and T Streets, N.W. The Council requests the Board of Education to erect appropriate signs at this adult education center in accordance with this act.

Designation of 7th Street, S.E., Oxon Run Road, S.E., and Edward Eugene Cornwell, Jr., Drive, S.E: Section 3 of D.C. Law 8-178 provided that pursuant to § 9-204.01, the minor streets created by the dedications referred to in § 2 of D.C. Law 8-178 shall be named, respectively, as 7th Street, S.E., Oxon Run Road, S.E., and Edward Eugene Cornwell, Jr., Drive, S.E., as shown on the Surveyor’s plat filed under S.O. 89-276. Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 8-178 provided that if the covenant required by § 2 of the act is not filed within 2 years of October 2, 1990, the act shall expire.

Designation of Juanita E. Thornton-Shepherd Park Branch Library: Section 2 of D.C. Law 9-78 provided that the Council renamed the Shepherd Park Branch of the District of Columbia Public Georgia Avenue, N.W., as the Juanita E. Thornton-Shepherd Park Branch of the District of Columbia Public Library. Section 4 of D.C. Law 9-78 provided that the act shall apply on September 15, 1992.

Designation of Ridgecrest Court: Section 2 of D.C. Law 9-242 provided that pursuant to this section, the Council of the District of Columbia designates the portion of Shipley Terrace, S.E., between the 1900 block and the 2100 block, as “Ridgecrest Court.”

Designation of Fraser Court: Section 2 of D.C. Law 10-93 provided that pursuant to §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03, the Council of the District of Columbia names the public alley in Square 110, running north to south between the 1900 block of R Street, N.W. and S Street, N.W. as “Fraser Court.”

Designation of Bishop Aimilianos Laloussis Park: Section 2 of D.C. Law 12-157 provided that, pursuant to this section, the small park located at 36th Street, Massachusetts Avenue and Garfield Street, N.W. (Reservation 330 N) is designated as the “Bishop Aimilianos Laloussis Park,” in honor of Bishop Laloussis’ humanitarian service to the Washington, D.C. community from 1934 to 1960.

Designation of Francis Anderson Gregory Regional Branch Library: Section 2 of D.C. Law 6-150 provided that the Council renamed the regional branch library known as the Fort Davis Regional Branch Library located at 3660 Alabama Avenue, S.E., Washington, D.C., as the Francis Anderson Gregory Regional Branch Library in recognition of the contributions of Francis Anderson Gregory in the field of education.

Designation of Patricia Roberts Harris Drive: Section 3 of D.C. Law 7-102 provided that pursuant to § 9-204.01, the minor street created by the dedication referred to in section 2 shall be named Patricia Roberts Harris Drive. Section 2 of D.C. Law 7-102 provided that pursuant to § 9-203.04, the Council of the District of Columbia accepts the dedication of land and approves the establishment of building restriction lines necessary to create a minor street in Square 4325 connecting 31st Place, N.E., and Fort Lincoln Drive, N.E., in Fort Lincoln New Town, as shown in the Surveyor’s plat filed under S.O. 85-189.

Designation of Officer Kevin J. Welsh Memorial Bridge: Section 2 of D.C. Law 7-193 provided that the Council of the District of Columbia designates the western structure of the 11th Street Bridge over the Anacostia River, which is part of Interstate 295 southbound, as the Officer Kevin J. Welsh Memorial Bridge.

Designation of Washington Avenue: Section 2 of D.C. Law 8-39 provided that pursuant to § 9-204.01, Canal Street, S.W., between Independence Avenue, S.W. and South Capital Street, shall be named Washington Avenue, S.W.

Designation of Grant Place, N.E., Burnham Place, N.E., Barnes Street, N.E., Albert Irvin Cassell Place, N.E., Franklin Delano Roosevelt Place, N.E., and Parkside Place, N.E: Section 4 of D.C. Law 8-81 provided that the minor streets created by the closings referred to in § 2 of D.C. Law 8-81 and by dedications referred to in § 3 of D.C. Law 8-81 shall be named or renamed Grant Place, N.E., Burnham Place, N.E., Barnes Street, N.E., Albert Irvin Cassell Place, N.E., Franklin Delano Roosevelt Place, N.E., and Parkside Place, N.E., as shown on the Surveyor’s plat filed under S.O. 88-212.

Designation of Officer Dana E. Harwood Memorial Pier: Section 2 of D.C. Law 8-115 provided that pursuant to § 9-204.01, the Council of the District of Columbia designated Pier 5, which is located at 550 Maine Avenue S.W., as the Officer Dana E. Harwood Memorial Pier.

Designation of Windy Court and Derby Lane: Section 2 of D.C. Law 8-174 provided that pursuant to § 9-204.01, the Council names the public alleys in Square 991 bounded by 11th Street, S.E., 12th Street, S.E., South Carolina Avenue, S.E., and D Street, S.E., as “Windy Court” and “Derby Lane”, respectively, as shown on the Surveyor’s plat filed under S.O. 89-282.

Designation of Naylor Court, N.W: Section 2 of D.C. Law 8-194 provided that pursuant to § 9-204.01 and notwithstanding § 9-204.03a, the north-south public alleys in Square 367, bounded by N Street, N.W., O Street, N.W., 9th Street, N.W., and 10th Street, N.W., are hereby designated as “Naylor Court, N.W.”

Designation of Dwight David Eisenhower Freeway: Section 2 of D.C. Law 8-223 provided that pursuant to § 9-204.01, a portion of Interstate 395 known as the Southwest Freeway, which is located between the 14th Street bridges and the 3rd Street tunnel, known as the Center Leg Freeway, shall be named “Dwight David Eisenhower Freeway”; and that a meaningful part of the full name cited in subsection (a) of this section may be used on each street sign that designates this name.

Designation of H. Carl Moultrie I Courthouse of the District of Columbia: Section 3 of D.C. Law 8-230 provided that pursuant to § 9-204.01, the District of Columbia Courthouse is hereby named the “H. Carl Moultrie, I, Courthouse of the District of Columbia” in honor of H. Carl Moultrie, I.

Designation of Spring of Freedom Street: Section 2 of D.C. Law 9-59 provided that pursuant to § 9-204.01, the portion of Linnean Avenue, N.W., in Ward 3 between Tilden Street, N.W., and Shoemaker Street, N.W., is designated as the “Spring of Freedom Street”.

Designation of Queen’s Stroll Place: D.C. Law 9-61 provided that pursuant to § 9-204.01, Drake Place, S.E., in Ward 7, parallel and between D and E Streets, S.E., and between 50th and 54th Streets, S.E., is designated as “Queen’s Stroll Place”.

Designation of Hugh A. Johnson, Jr., Park: Section 2 of D.C. Law 9-68 provided that the park located at South Dakota Avenue and Irving Street, N.E., shall be named the “Hugh A. Johnson, Jr., Park”.

Designation of Carbery Place: Section 2 of D.C. Law 9-117 provided that pursuant to this section, the Council of the District of Columbia names the public alley that abuts lot 29, in Square 812, bounded by 4th Street, 5th Street, and D Street, N.E., as “Carbery Place”.

Designation of Zei Alley: Section 2 of D.C. Law 9-162 provided that the Council of the District of Columbia designates the public alley in Square 220, bounded by 14th Street, 15th Street, H Street, and I Street, N.W., running east to west between 14th and 15th Streets, N.W., in Ward 2, as Zei Alley.

Designation of Islamic Way: Section 2 of D.C. Law 9-172 provided that the Council of the District of Columbia designates the 1500 block of 4th Street, N.W., between P and Q Streets, N.W., in Ward 5, as Islamic Way.

Designation of Estelle Simms, Bloomingdale, Edgewood, Eckington (BEE) Civic Park: Section 2(a) of D.C. Law 9-195 provided that the small park located at Rhode Island Avenue and U Street, N.W. (Lot 1, Square 3112), shall be named the Estelle Simms, Bloomingdale, Edgewood, Eckington (BEE) Civic Park.

Section 2(b) of D.C. Law 9-195 provided that a meaningful part of the full name cited in section 2(a) of Law 9-195 may be used on a park sign that designates this name.

Designation of Mitch Snyder Place: Section 2 of D.C. Law 9-220 provided that the Council of the District of Columbia designated the 400 block of 2nd Street, N.W., between D and E Streets, N.W., as Mitch Snyder Place. The 400 block of 2nd Street, N.W., shall concurrently be known as 2nd Street and Mitch Snyder Place.

Designation of Malcolm X Avenue: Section 2 of D.C. Law 9-225 provided that the Council of the District of Columbia designates the portion of Portland Street, S.E., between 9th Street, S.E. and South Capitol Street, S.E., as Malcolm X Avenue.

Designation of John A. Wilson Building: Section 3 of D.C. Law 10-69 provided that pursuant to § 9-204.01, the District Building, located at 1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, N.W., is hereby renamed the “John A. Wilson Building.”

Designation of St. Francis de Sales Place: Section 2 of D.C. Law 10-81 provided that pursuant to § 9-204.01, the Council of the District of Columbia designates the 2000 block of Fulton Place, N.E., as “St. Francis de Sales Place.”

Designation of Theodore R. Hagans, Jr., Center: Section 2 of D.C. Law 10-141 provided that pursuant to this section, the Fort Lincoln Cultural Center located at 31st Place and Fort Lincoln Drive, N.E., shall be named the Theodore R. Hagans, Jr., Center.

Dedication of Woodcrest Drive: Section 3 of D.C. Law 10-197 provided that the minor street created by the dedication referred to in § 2 of that act shall be named Woodcrest Drive.

Designation of Maurice T. Turner, Jr., Education and Training Center: Section 2 of D.C. Law 10-239 provided that pursuant to § 9-204.01, the Metropolitan Police Academy located 4665 Blue Plains Drive, S.W., is designated the “Maurice T. Turner, Jr., Education and Training Center.”

Dedication of Harry Thomas Way: Section 2 of D.C. Law 12-251 accepted, on a temporary basis, the dedication of land located between Eckington Place, N.E. and Third Street, N.E., as a public street, and designated the street as Harry Thomas Way.

Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 12-251 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Designation of Henry J. Daly Building: Section 2 of D.C. Law 11-120 provided that pursuant to this section, the Municipal Center located at 300 Indiana Avenue, N.W., is designated the “Henry J. Daly Building.”

Designation of Joseph H. Cole Fitness Center: Section 2 of D.C. Law 11-251 provided that pursuant to this section, the Council of the District of Columbia designated the recreation center located at 1200 Morse Street, N.E., formerly known as the Wheatley Recreation Center, as the “Joseph H. Cole Fitness Center.”

Designation of Dwight Anderson Mosley Athletic Field: Section 3 of D.C. Law 12-105 provided that, pursuant to this section, the Council of the District of Columbia designates the outdoor recreational facilities of Taft Junior High School, at 18th and Perry Streets, N.E., the Dwight Anderson Mosley Athletic Field.

Designation of Brian T.A. Gibson Memorial Building: Section 3 of D.C. Law 12-73 provided that pursuant to this section, the Council of the District of Columbia designates the Fourth District Police Headquarters, located at 6001 Georgia Avenue, N.W., as the Brian T. A. Gibson Memorial Building.

Designation of James M. McGee, Jr. Street, S.E: Section 2 of D.C. Law 12-83 provided that pursuant to this section, the Council of District of Columbia designates the 2700 block of Irving Street, S.E. as “James M. McGee, Jr. Street S.E.”

Designation of Ronald H. Brown Middle School: Section 3 of D.C. Law 12-84 provided that pursuant to this section, the Council hereby renames the Daniel C. Roper Middle School, located at 4800 Meade Street, N.E., as the “Ronald H. Brown Middle School.”

Designation of Old Rock Creek Church Road, N.W: Section 2 of D.C. Law 12-166 provided that pursuant to this section, the unnumbered block of Rock Creek Church Road, N.W. between North Capitol and Webster Streets, N.W. is designated as “Old Rock Creek Church Road, N.W.”

Designation of Harris/Hinton Place N.W: Section 3 of D.C. Law 12-235 provided that pursuant to this section, the Council of the District of Columbia designated the unit block of Hanover Place N.W. as Harris/Hinton Place, N.W.

Designation of Bishop Samuel Kelsey Way, N.W: Section 4 of D.C. Law 12-235, as amended by section 10 of D.C. Law 13-313 provided that pursuant to this section, the Council of the District of Columbia designated the 1400 block of Park Road, N.W., as Bishop Samuel Kelsey Way, N.W. Designation of Walter C. Pierce Community Park: Section 2 of D.C. Law 11-1 provided that the Community Park West located at 2700 Adams Mill Road, N.W., at the intersection of Ontario Place, N.W. (Square 2547 and Lot 810), shall be named the “Walter C. Pierce Community Park.”

Section 3 of D.C. Law 11-1 provided that a meaningful part of the full name “Walter C. Pierce Community Park” may be used on a park sign designating the name of the park.

Section 4 of D.C. Law 11-1 provided that the Secretary of the Council of the District of Columbia shall transmit a copy of the act, after it becomes effective, to the Surveyor of the District of Columbia, who shall record in the Office of the Surveyor, “Walter C. Pierce Community Park” as the name of the park.

Designation of Isle of Patmos Plaza: Section 2 of D.C. Law 11-41 provided that the Council of the District of Columbia designates the 1200 block of Douglas Street, N.E., as the “Isle of Patmos Plaza”.

Section 3 of D.C. Law 13-108 provided: “Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Code § 7-451 § 9-204.01, 2001 Ed. ) (‘the Act’), and notwithstanding the requirements set forth in section 405 of the Act ( D.C. Code § 7-455 § 9-204.04, 2001 Ed. ) that no public space shall be named in honor of any person who has been deceased less than 2 years, the Council of the District of Columbia designates the triangular park located at the intersection of 15th Street, S.E., G Street, S.E., and Potomac Avenue, S.E. (Reservation 255-n) as the ‘Dennis Dolinger Memorial Park.’ ”

Section 2 of D.C. Law 13-282 provided: “Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, the Council of the District of Columbia designates the unit 100 block of 9th Street, N.W., and the unit 100, 200, 300, and 400 blocks of 9th Street, S.W., commonly known as the Ninth Street Tunnel, as the ‘Anthony W. Simms Tunnel’.”

Sections 2 to 4 of D.C. Law 13-284 provided:

“Sec. 2. Pursuant to sections 401 and 403 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982 the Council of the District of Columbia designates the alley that runs North-South between 14th and 15th Streets, N.W., as ‘Historic Waverly Alley’.

“Sec. 3. Pursuant to sections 401 and 403 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982 the Council of the District of Columbia designates the alley that runs East-West between and parallel to U and T Streets, N.W., and between 14th and 15th Streets, N.W., as ‘Paloma Way’.

“Sec. 4. Pursuant to sections 401 and 403 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982 the Council of the District of Columbia designates the alley that runs North-South between U and T Streets, N.W., and to the east of Historic Waverly Alley, as ‘Treto Way’.”

Section 3 of D.C. Law 13-295 provided: “Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982 the Council of the District of Columbia designates the triangular park located at the intersection of Western Avenue, Ellicott Street, N.W. and 48th Street, N.W., in Ward 3, (Reservation 454-n) as the ‘Galen Tait Memorial Park’.”

Section 3 of D.C. Law 14-32 provided: “Sec. 3. Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code 9-204.01), the Council designates the park in the 5100 block of Illinois Avenue, th Street, N.W., as the ‘Lorenzo Larry Allen Memorial Park’.”

Section 3 of D.C. Law 14-39 provided: “Sec. 3. Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code 9-204.01) (‘the Act’), the Council of the District of Columbia designates the triangular park located at the intersection of 9th Street, N.W., Q Street, N.W., and Rhode Island Avenue, N.W., (Reservation 157), as the ‘Carter G. Woodson Memorial Park’.” Designation of Washington Place, N.E.: Section 5 of D.C. Law 14-103 provided that pursuant to this section, a portion of South Ave., N.E. is closed and designated as Washington Place, N.E.

Section 2 of D.C. Law 14-123 provided: “Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, the Engine Company No. 6 fire station, located at 1300 New Jersey Avenue, N.W., is hereby designated the ‘John T. ’Big John’ Williams Building’.”

Section 2 of D.C. Law 14-127 provided: “Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, and notwithstanding section 407 of the Act, the Council of the District of Columbia designates the plaza formed by the sidewalks on the north side of Square 441 and the south side of Square 440 of the 600 block of T Street, N.W., between Florida Avenue, N.W., and 7th Street, N.W., as ‘Edward ’Duke’ Ellington Plaza’.” Designation of Cady’s Alley: Section 2 of D.C. Law 14-272 provided: “Pursuant to sections 401 and 403 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03), the Council of the District of Columbia designates the alley that runs East-West between 33rd and 34th Streets, N.W., and parallel to M Street and Water Street, N.W. as ’Cady’s Alley”’. Designation of Carl Wilson Basketball Court: Section 2 of D.C. Law 14-292 provided: “Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-204.01), the basketball court at the Hardy Recreation Center is hereby named the ‘Carl Wilson Basketball Court’.” Designation of William H. Rumsey, SR. Aquatic Center: Section 2 of D.C. Law 15-4 provided: “Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-204.01)(’Act’), and notwithstanding section 405 of the Act ( D.C. Official Code § 9-204.05) that no public space shall be named in honor of any person who has been deceased less than 2 years, the Council designates the Capitol East Natatorium, located at 635 North Carolina Avenue, S.E., as the ‘William H. Rumsey, Sr. Aquatic Center’.” Designation of Marvin Caplan Memorial Park; Section 2 of D.C. Law 15-6 provided: “Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-204.01), the Council designates the park bounded by Alaska Avenue, N.W., Holly Street, N.W., and 13th Street, N.W., as the ‘Marvin Caplan Memorial Park’.” Designation of Henry Kennedy Memorial Tennis Courts: Section 2 of D.C. Law 15-126 provided: “Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-204.01)(’Act’), the Council designates the tennis courts located at the corner of 3rd and Van Buren Streets, N.W., as the ‘Henry Kennedy Memorial Tennis Courts’.”

Section 2 of D.C. Law 15-144 provided: “Sec. 2. (a) Notwithstanding any provision of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-202.01 et seq.) (‘Act’), the Council orders the closing of the 600 block of I Street, S.E., as shown on the revised Surveyor’s plat filed under S.O. 95-251.

“(b) Notwithstanding any provision of the Act, the Council accepts the dedication of land for street purposes, which is the existing functioning street that is located immediately north of and parallel to the Southeast Freeway between 6th Street, S.E., and 7th Street, S.E., and designates this street as ‘Virginia Avenue, S.E.,’ as shown on the revised Surveyor’s plat filed under S.O. 95-251.

Designation of Freedom Way: Section 2 of D.C. Law 15-168 provided: “Pursuant to sections 401 and 403 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03), the Council designates the alley bound by Potomac Avenue, S.E., Kentucky Avenue, S.E., 15th Street, S.E., and Pennsylvania Avenue, S.E., in Ward 6, as ‘Freedom Way’.”

Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-5 provided

“Sec. 3. Pursuant to sections 302 and 401 of the Act, the Council accepts the dedication of the streets and alleys in Squares 5246, 5272, 5273, 5276, 5277, 5279, 5280, and 5281, as shown on the Surveyor’s plats filed under S.O. 02-4088, and dedicates the streets as extensions of 57th Street, S.E., 57th Place, S.E., and Blaine Street, N.E., as shown on the Surveyor’s plats in the S.O. File 02-4088. The approval of the Council of this dedication is contingent upon the satisfaction of all the conditions set forth in the official S.O. File 02-4088.”

Designation of Old Morgan School Place: Section 2 of D.C. Law 16-52, as amended by section 2 of D.C. Law 18-166, provided:

“Sec. 2. Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-204.01), and notwithstanding section 304 (D.C. Official Code § 9-203.04), the Council designates:

“(1) The alley in Square 2562 that runs east-west from Champlain Street, N.W., to Ontario Road, N.W., parallel to Florida Avenue, N.W., as a street; and

“(2) The street, currently designated as an alley, that runs east-west between Champlain Street, N.W., and Ontario Road, N.W., parallel to Florida Avenue, N.W., in Square 2562, as “Old Morgan School Place.”

Designation of Walt Whitman Way: Section 2 of D.C. Law 16-54 provided: “Pursuant to sections 401 and 403a of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201, D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a), the Council symbolically designates F Street, N.W., between 7th Street, N.W., and 8th Street, N.W., as Walt Whitman Way.”

Designation of National Opera Street: Section 2 of D.C. Law 16-92 provided: “Pursuant to sections 401 and 403a of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a), the Council symbolically designates the 2700 block of F Street, N.W., as ‘National Opera Street’.”

Designation of Walter E. Washington Way: Section 2 of D.C. Law 16-106 provided: “Sec. 2. Pursuant to sections 401 and 403a of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a), the Council symbolically designates the 300 block of 13 1/2 Street, N.W., as ‘Walter E. Washington Way’.”

Designation of Home of Walter Washington Way: Section 2 of D.C. Law 16-107 provided: “Sec. 2. Pursuant to sections 401 and 403a of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a), the Council symbolically designates the 400 block of J Street, N.W., as ‘Home of Walter Washington Way’.”

Designation of Terry Hairston Run: Section 2 of D.C. Law 16-108 provided: “Sec. 2. Pursuant to section 401 and 403a of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a), the Council symbolically designates the 300 block of Burns Street, S.E., as ‘Terry Hairston Run’.”

Designation of Carolyn Llorente Memorial Park: Section 2 of D.C. Law 16-109 provided: “Sec. 2. Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-204.01), the Council designates the park bounded by Columbia Road, N.W., 19th Street, N.W., and Wyoming Avenue, N.W., as the ‘Carolyn Llorente Memorial Park’.”

Designation of Marvin Gaye Recreation Center and Playground: Section 2 of D.C. Law 16-177 provided: Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code s 9-204.01), the Council designates the Watts Branch Recreation Center and the Watts Branch Playground located within the Marvin Gaye Park, as the ‘Marvin Gaye Recreation Center’ and ‘Marvin Gaye Playground,’ respectively.”

Designation of Kimi Gray Court, S.E., and Ivory Walters Lane, S.E.; Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-180 provided: “Pursuant to section 401 of the Act (D.C. Official Code § 9-204.01), and as set forth in the official file of S.O. 05-8132, the Council designates:

“(1) The new public horseshoe street off of 51st Street, S.E., as ‘Kimi Gray Court, S.E.’; and

“(2) The new public street between G Street, S.E., and 51st Street, S.E., as ‘Ivory Walters Lane S.E.’.”

Designation of Walter E. Washington Convention Center: Section 2 of D.C. Law 16-283 provided: “Pursuant to sections 401 and 405 of the Street and Alley Closing Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D. C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.05), the Council designates the Washington Convention Center, located at 801 Mount Vernon Place, N.W., as the ‘Walter E. Washington Convention Center’.”

Designation of Lorraine H. Whitlock Memorial Bridge: Section 2 of Law 17-11 provided: “Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-204.01), the Council designates the Benning Road Bridge, located between 34th Street, N. E., and Minnesota Avenue, N.E., as the ‘Lorraine H. Whitlock Memorial Bridge’.”

Designation of Calvin Woodland Sr. Place: Section 2 of D.C. Law 17-36 provided: “Pursuant to sections 401 and 403a of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a) (‘Act’), and notwithstanding section 407 of the Act (D.C. Official Code § 9-204.07), the Council symbolically designates Hartford Street, S.E., from Alabama Avenue, S.E., to 22nd Street, S.E., as ‘Calvin Woodland Sr. Place’.”

Designation of Adams Alley: Section 2 of D.C. Law 17-37 provided: “Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-204.01), the Council designates the alley in Square 2566 that runs east to west from 17th Street, N.W., toward Ontario Road, N.W., and parallel to Kalorama Road, N.W., and Euclid Street, N.W., as ‘Adams Alley’.”

Designation of Joe Pozell Square: Section 2 of D.C. Law 17-38 provided: “Pursuant to sections 401 and 403a of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a), the Council symbolically designates the intersection at Wisconsin Avenue, N.W., and M Street, N.W., as ‘Joe Pozell Square’.”

Designation of Hattie Holmes Senior Wellness Center: Section 2 of D.C. Law 17-92 provided: “Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201, D.C. Official Code § 9-204.01), the site of the old Kennedy Kennedy Street, N.W., in Ward 4, is designated as the ‘Hattie Holmes Senior Wellness Center’.”

Designation of E.W. Stevenson, Sr. Boulevard: Section 2 of D.C. Law 17-178 provided: “Pursuant to sections 401 and 403a of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a) (‘Act’), and notwithstanding section 407 of the Act (D.C. Official Code § 9-204.07), the Council symbolically designates the 2500 block of 12th Place, S.E., as ‘E.W. Stevenson, Sr. Boulevard’.”

Designation of Gerard W. Burke, Jr. Building: Section 2 of D.C. Law 17-182 provided: “Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-204.01), the Metropolitan Police Department Third District Substation, located at 750 Park Road, N.W., in Ward 1, is designated as the ‘Gerard W. Burke, Jr. Building’.”

Designation of Rev. M. Cecil Mills Way: Section 2 of Law 17-194 provided: “Pursuant to sections 401 and 403a of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a) (‘Act’), and notwithstanding section 407 of the Act (D.C. Official Code § 9-204.07), the Council symbolically designates the 1600 block of Newton Street, N.W. as ‘Rev. M. Cecil Mills Way’.”

Designation of the Ethel Kennedy Bridge: Section 2 of D.C. Law 17-195 provided: “Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-204.01) (‘Act’), and notwithstanding section 405 of the Act (D.C. Official Code § 9-204.05), the Benning Road Bridge, over the Anacostia River, is named the ‘Ethel Kennedy Bridge’.”

Designation of Abe Pollin Way: Section 2 of D.C. Law 17-200 provided: “Pursuant to sections 401 and 403a of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a) (‘Act’), and notwithstanding sections 405 and 407 of the Act (D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204. 05 and 9-204.07), the Council symbolically designates the 600 block of F Street, N.W., between 6th Street, N.W., and 7th Street, N.W., in Ward 2, as ‘Abe Pollin Way’.”

Designation of Dr. Vincent E. Reed Auditorium: Section 3 of D.C. Law 17-203 provided: “Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-204.01) (‘Act’), and notwithstanding section 405 of the Act (D.C. Official Code § 9-204.05), the auditorium at Benjamin Banneker Academic High School, located at 800 Euclid Street, N.W., in Ward 1, is named the ‘Dr. Vincent E. Reed Auditorium’.”

Designation of Lauzun’s Legion Bridge: Section 2 of D.C. Law 17-256 provided: “Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-204.01), the Council designates the P Street Bridge, bounded by P Street, N.W., and 23rd Street, N.W., in Ward 2, as the ‘Lauzun’s Legion Bridge’.”

Designation of Maury Wills Baseball Field: Section 2 of D.C. Law 17-257 provided: “Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-204.01) (‘Act’), and notwithstanding section 405 of the Act (D.C. Official Code § 9-204.05), the Council designates the baseball field at the Banneker Recreation Center, located at the 2500 block of Georgia Avenue, N.W., in Ward 1, as the ‘Maury Wills Baseball Field’.”

Designation of Marvin Gaye Way: Section 2 of D.C. Law 17-261 provided: “Pursuant to sections 401 and 403a of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a) (‘Act’), and notwithstanding section 407 of the Act (D.C. Official Code § 9-204.07), the Council symbolically designates the 5200 block of Foote Street N.E., between Division Avenue, N.E., and 52nd Street, N.E., in Ward 7, as ‘Marvin Gaye Way’.”

Designation of Lola Beaver Memorial Park; Section 2 of D.C. Law 17-267 provided: “Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-204.01), the Council designates the park in Square 0918, bounded by Massachusetts Avenue, N.E., 9th Street, N.E., and A Street, N.E., in Ward 6, as ‘Lola Beaver Memorial Park’.”

Designation of Jackson H. Gerhart House: Section 2 of D.C. Law 17-268 provided: “Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201, D.C. Official Code § 9-204.01), the Council designates the Engine Company No. 17 fire station, located at 1227 Monroe Street, N. E., in Ward 5, as the ‘Jackson H. Gerhart House’.”

Designation of Fire Chief Burton W. Johnson Building: Section 2 of D.C. Law 17-272 provided: “Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-204.01), the Council designates Engine Company No. 4 fire station, located at 2501 Sherman Avenue, N. W., in Ward 1, as the ‘Fire Chief Burton W. Johnson Building’.”

Designation of Langston Hughes Way: Section 2 of D.C. Law 17-323 provided: “Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-204.01) (‘Act’), and notwithstanding sections 405 and 407 of the Act (D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.05 and 9-204.07), the Council symbolically designates V Street, N.W., from 13th Street, N.W., to 14th Street, N.W., in Ward 1, as ‘Langston Hughes Way’.”

Designation of Duke Ellington Way, Chuck Brown Way, and Cathy Hughes Way at the Howard Theater: Section 2 of D.C. Law 17-329 provided:

“Sec. 2. Pursuant to sections 401 and 403a of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a) (‘Act’), the Council symbolically designates:

“(1) Notwithstanding section 407 of the Act (D.C. Official Code § 9-204.07), T Street, N.W., from 6th Street, N.W., to 7th Street, N.W., as ‘Duke Ellington Way;’ and

“(2) Notwithstanding sections 405 and 407 of the Act (D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.05 and 9-204.07), 7th Street, N.W., from T Street, N.W., to Florida Avenue, N.W., as ‘Chuck Brown Way’, and 7th Street, N.W., from § Street, N. W., to T Street, N.W., as ‘Cathy Hughes Way’.”

Designation of Reverend Dr. Luke Mitchell, Jr. Way: Section 2 of D.C. Law 17-330 provided: “Pursuant to sections 401 and 403a of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a) (‘Act’), and notwithstanding sections 405 and 407 of the Act (D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.05 and 9-204.07), the Council symbolically designates the 700 block of 58th Street, N.E., between Nannie Helen Burroughs Avenue, N.E., and Eastern Avenue, N.E., in Ward 7, as ‘Reverend Dr. Luke Mitchell, Jr. Way’.”

Designation of the Andrus House: Section 2 of D.C. Law 17-331 provided: “Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-204.01) (‘Act’), the Council designates the home, located at 2635 18th Street, N.E., in Ward 5, as ‘The Andrus House’, in honor of Dr. Ethel Percy Andrus, founder of AARP.”

Designation of Taxation Without Representation Street: Section 2 of D.C. Law 17-332 provided: “Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-204.01), the Council renames the portion of South Capitol Street, S.E., between N Street, S.E., and Potomac Avenue, S.E., in Ward 6, as ‘Taxation Without Representation Street, S.E.’.”

Designation of Dr. Purvis J. Williams Auditorium and Athletic Field: Section 2 of D.C. Law 17-333 provided: “Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-204.01) (‘Act’), and not withstanding sections 405 and 407 of the Act (D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.05 and 9-204.07), the Council designates the auditorium and the athletic field located at Joel Elias Spingarn Senior High school, located at 2500 Benning Road, N.E., in Ward 5, as the ‘Dr. Purvis J. Williams Auditorium’ and the ‘Dr. Purvis J. Williams Athletic Field’.”

Designation of Hal Gordon Way: Section 2 of D.C. Law 17-334 provided: “Pursuant to sections 401 and 403a of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a) (‘Act’), and notwithstanding sections 405 and 407 of the Act (D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204. 05 and 9-204.07), the Council symbolically designates the 100 block of 15th Street, S.E., in Ward 6, as ‘Hal Gordon Way,’ in honor of the late Harold J. Gordon.”

Designation of Public Streets at The Yards: Section 5 of D.C. Law 18-39 provided: “Pursuant to section 401 (D.C. Official Code s 9-204.01) and notwithstanding section 402 of the Act (D.C. Official Code § 9-204.02), the dedication of land as described in section 3 and on the Surveyor’s plat filed in S.O. 07-8802 shall be designated as follows:

“(1) The eastern extension of Tingey Street, S.E., between 4th Street, S.E., and 5th Street, S.E., shall be designated as Tingey Street, S.E.

“(2) The western extension of N Street, S.E., (Closed) between 1st Street, S.E., and Canal Street, S.E., and between Canal Street, S.E., and Public Space in Square W-771 shall be designated as N Street, S.E.

“(3) The southern most street running east-west shall be designated as Water Street, S.E.

“(4) The eastern most street running north-south shall be designated as 5th Street, S.E.

“(5) The southern extension of 4th Street, S.E., shall be designated as 4th Street, S.E.

“(6) The north-south street between Public Space in Square W-771 and 4th Street, S.E., shall be designated as 3rd Street, S.E.

“(7) The western most street running north-south shall be designated as 2nd Street, S.E.”

Designation of Bloomington Court Alley: Section 2 of D.C. Law 18-67 provided: “Pursuant to sections 401 and 403 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-204.01 and § 9-204.03), the Council designates the alley in Square 3116, bordered by the 100 blocks of U Street, N.W., and V Street, N.W., and the 2000 blocks of 1st Street, N.W., and Flagler Place, N.W., as ‘Bloomingdale Court’.”

Designation of Loree H. Murray Way: Section 2 of D.C. Law 18-79 provided: “Pursuant to sections 401 and 403a of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a) (‘Act’), and not withstanding section 405 (D.C. Official Code § 9-204.05) of the Act, the Council symbolically designates the 1100 block of 7th Street, N.E., as ‘Loree H. Murray Way’.”

Designation of Msgr J. Mundell Way: Section 2 of D.C. Law 18-171 provided:

“Pursuant to sections 401 and 403a of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a) (“Act”), and notwithstanding section 407 of the Act (D.C. Official Code § 9-204.07), the Council symbolically designates the 800 block of N Street, N.W., in Ward 2, as ‘Msgr J. Mundell Way’.”

Designation of Ronald H. Brown Way: Section 2 of D.C. Law 18-172 provided:

“Pursuant to sections 401 and 403a of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a) (“Act”), and notwithstanding section 407 of the Act (D.C. Official Code § 9-204.07), the Council symbolically designates the 200 and 300 blocks of 14th Street, N.W., in Ward 2, as ‘Ronald H. Brown Way’.”

Designation of Rev. Dr. Edward Thomas Way: Section 2 of D.C. Law 18-173 provided:

“Pursuant to sections 401 and 403a of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a) (‘Act’), and notwithstanding section 407 of the Act (D.C. Official Code § 9-204.07), the Council symbolically designates the 2700 block of 13th Street, N.W., as ‘Rev. Dr. Edward Thomas Way’.”

Designation of Tenth Street Community Park; Section 2 of D.C. Law 18-175 provided:

“Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D. C. Official Code § 9-204.01), the Council designates the park in Lot 874, Square 369, bounded by 10th Street, N.W., L Street, N.W., and M Street, N.W., in Ward 2, as ‘Tenth Street Community Park’.”

Designation of Mamie “Peanut” Johnson Field: Section 2 of D.C. Law 18-243 provided: “Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; DC Official Code § 9-204.01) (‘Act’), and notwithstanding section 405 of the Act (D.C. Official Code § 9-204.05), the Council designates the field located at the Rosedale Recreation Gales Street, N.E., in Ward 6, as the “Mamie ‘Peanut’ Johnson Field”.

Designation of Duke Ellington Park: Section 2 of D.C. Law 18-244 provided: “Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D. C. Official Code § 9-204.01), the Council designates the park bounded by New Hampshire Avenue, N.W., M Street, N.W., and 21st Street, N.W., in Ward 2, as ‘Duke Ellington Park’.”

Designation of Bishop William F. Hart, Jr. Way: Section 2 of D.C. Law 18-245 provided: “Pursuant to sections 401 and 403a of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a) (‘Act’), and notwithstanding sections 405 and 407 of the Act (D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.05 and 9-204.07), the Council symbolically designates the 1000 block of V Street, N.W., as ‘Bishop William F. Hart, Jr. Way’.”

Designation of Ingraham Street, N.E.: Section 3 of D.C. Law 18-247 provided:

“(a) Pursuant to sections 302 and 401 of the Act (D.C. Official Code §§ 9-203.02 and 9-204.01), and notwithstanding the requirements set forth in sections 303 and 304 of the Act (D.C. Official Code §§ 9-203.03 and 9-203.04), the Council accepts the dedication of the new portion of Ingraham Street, N.E., as shown on the Surveyor’s dedication plat filed under S.O. 09-11837, and designates the street as ‘Ingraham Street, N.E.’.”

“(b) The Council’s acceptance of the dedication of land described in subsection (a) of this section is contingent upon the filing of the dedication plat in the Office of the Surveyor.”

Designation of PeterBug Matthews Way: Section 2 of D.C. Law 18-248 provided: “Pursuant to sections 401 and 403a of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a) (‘Act’), and notwithstanding sections 405 and 407 of the Act (D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204. 05 and 9-204.07), the Council symbolically designates the 400 block of 13th Street, S.E., as ‘PeterBug Matthews Way’.”

Designation of Dorothy Irene Height Memorial Library: Section 2 of D.C. Law 18-249 provided: “Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-204.01) (‘Act’), and not withstanding section 405 of the Act (D.C. Official Code § 9-204.05), the Council designates the Benning Neighborhood Library, located at 3935 Benning Road, N. E., in Ward 7, as the ‘Dorothy Irene Height Memorial Library’.”

Designation of Frank Kameny Way: Section 2 of D.C. Law 18-250 provided: “Pursuant to sections 401 and 403a of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a) (‘Act’), and notwithstanding sections 405 and 407 of the Act (D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204. 05 and 9-204.07), the Council symbolically designates the 1600 block of 17th Street, N.W., between Q Street, N.W., and R Street, N.W., as ‘Frank Kameny Way’.”

Designation of Rev. Donald Robinson Field: Section 2 of D.C. Law 18-325 provided: “Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-204.01) (‘Act’), and notwithstanding section 405 of the Act (D.C. Official Code § 9-204.05), the Council designates the athletic field located at the Edgewood Recreation rd Street, N.E., and Evarts Street, N.E., in Ward 5, as the ‘Rev. Donald Robinson Field’.”

Designation of Bernice Elizabeth Fonteneau “Miss B’s” Senior Wellness Center: Section 2 of D.C. Law 18-326 provided: “Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-204.01), the Council designates the senior wellness center located at 3531 Georgia Avenue, N.W., in Ward 1, as the ‘Bernice Elizabeth Fonteneau ‘Miss B’s’ Senior Wellness Center’.”

Designation of Thelma Jones Way: Section 2 of D.C. Law 18-332 provided: “Pursuant to sections 401 and 403a of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a) (‘Act’), and notwithstanding sections 405 and 407 of the Act (D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204. 05 and 9-204.07), the Council symbolically designates the alley between U Place, S.E., and Good Hope Road, S.E., as ‘Thelma Jones Way’.”

Designation of The Park at LeDroit: Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-61 provided:

“Sec. 2. Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D. C. Official Code § 9-204.01), the Council designates the park bounded by V Street, N.W., 2nd Street, N.W., and Elm Street, N.W., in Ward 1, as ‘The Park at LeDroit’.”

Designation of the Rita B. Bright Family and Youth Center: Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-66 provided:

“Sec. 2. Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D. C. Official Code § 9-204.01), the Department of Parks and Recreation building located at 2500 14th Street, N.W., is designated as the ‘Rita B. Bright Family and Youth Center’.”

Designation of Martin Luther King Drive: Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-68 provided:

“Sec. 2. Pursuant to sections 401 and 403a of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a) (‘Act’), and notwithstanding the second sentence in section 403a and section 407 of the Act (D.C. Official Code § 9-204.07), the Council symbolically designates the public street starting on the corner of Martin Luther King, Jr. Avenue, S.E., and Good Hope Road, S.E., moving across the 11th Street Bridge, across the Southeast Freeway, across the Southwest Freeway, onto Maine Avenue, S.W., and ending on the corner of Maine Avenue, S.W., and Raoul Wallenberg Place, S.W., as ‘Martin Luther King, Jr. Drive’.”

Designation of William O. Lockridge Way: Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-85 provided:

Pursuant to section 401 and 403a of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a) (‘Act’), and notwithstanding sections 405 and 407 of the Act (D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204. 05 and 9-204.07), the Council of the District of Columbia symbolically designates the public street Valley Avenue, S.E., between 4th Street, S.E., and 9th Street, S.E., as ‘William O. Lockridge Way’.”

Designation of Southwest Duck Pond: Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-105 provided:

Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D. C. Official Code § 9-204.01), the Council designates the park located at 6th Street, S.W., and I Street, S.W., in Ward 6, as the ‘Southwest Duck Pond’.”

Designation of Paul Washington Way: Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-107 provided:

“Sec. 2. Pursuant to sections 401 and 403a of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 204.03a) (‘Act’), and notwithstanding section 407 of the Act (D.C. Official Code § 9-204.07), the Council symbolically designates the 4600 block of 12th Street, N.E., in Ward 5, as ‘Paul Washington Way’.”

Designation of Glover Park Community Center: Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-108 provided:

“Sec. 2. Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-204.01) (‘Act’), and notwithstanding section 405 of the Act (D.C. Official Code § 9-204.05), the Council designates the Stoddert Recreation Center, located at 39th Street, N.W., and Calvert Street, N.W., in Ward 3, as the ‘Glover Park Community Center’.”

Designation of Rev. Dr. Jerry A. Moore, Jr. Commemorative Plaza: Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-109 provided:

“Sec. 2. Pursuant to sections 401 and 403a of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a) (‘Act’), and notwithstanding sections 405 and 407 of the Act (D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204. 05 and 9-204.07), the Council symbolically designates the public space encompassing the 4600 block of 16th Street, N.W., the 1600 block of Buchanan Street, N.W., the 1600 block of Crittenden Street, N.W., and the 4600 block of 17th Street, N.W., in Ward 4, as the ‘Rev. Dr. Jerry A. Moore, Jr. Commemorative Plaza’.”

Designation of 9/11 Memorial Grove: Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-114 provided:

“Sec. 2. Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01), the Council designates the park in Reservations 328 and 329, located at the intersection of Massachusetts Avenue, N.W., and Fulton Street, N.W., in Ward 3, as the ‘ 9/11 Memorial Grove’.”

Designation of Lillian A. Gordon Water Play Area and Margaret B. Cooper and Lillian A. Gordon Park; Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-117 provided:

“Sec. 2. Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-204.01) (‘Act’), and notwithstanding sections 405 and 407 of the Act (D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.05 and 9-204.07), the Council designates:

“(1) The water play area at the Kennedy Recreation Center, located as 1401 7th Street, N.W., in Ward 2, the ‘Lillian A. Gordon Water Play Area’; and

“(2) The park located at 6th Street, N.W., between R Street, N.W., and Rhode Island Avenue, N.W., in Ward 2, the ‘Margaret B. Cooper and Lillian A. Gordon Park’.”

Designation of Willie Wood Way: Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-118 provided:

“Sec. 2. Pursuant to sections 401 and 403a of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a) (‘Act’), and notwithstanding sections 405 and 407 of the Act (D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204. 05 and 9-204.07), the Council symbolically designates the unit block of N Street, N.W., between 1st Street, N.W., and New York Avenue, N.W., in Ward 5, as ‘Willie Wood Way’.”

Designation of William O’Neal Lockridge Memorial Library at Bellevue: Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-119 provided:

“Sec. 2. Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-204.01) (‘Act’), and notwithstanding section 405 of the Act (D.C. Official Code § 9-204.05), the Council designates the Washington Highlands Neighborhood Library, located at 115 Atlantic Street, S.W., in Ward 8, as the ‘William O’Neal Lockridge Memorial Library at Bellevue’.”

Designation of Adolf Cluss Court: Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-154 provided:

“Sec. 2. Pursuant to sections 401 and 403a of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a) (‘Act’), and notwithstanding section 407 of the Act (D.C. Official Code § 9-204.07), the Council designates the alley between C Street, S.E., and D Street, S.E., and parallel to 12th Street, S.E., and 13th Street, S.E., as ‘Adolf Cluss Court’.”

Designation of Elizabeth P. Thomas Way: ‘Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-159 provided:

“Sec. 2. Pursuant to sections 401 and 403a of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a), the Council symbolically designates Quackenbos Street, N.W., between Georgia Avenue, N.W., and 13th Street, N.W., in Ward 4, as ‘Elizabeth P. Thomas Way’.”

Designation of “Where Lincoln’s Legacy Lives”; Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-160 provided:

“Sec. 2. Pursuant to sections 401 and 403a of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a) (‘Act’), and notwithstanding section 407 of the Act (D.C. Official Code § 9-204.07), the Council symbolically designates the public space of the 500 block of 10th Street, N.W., between E Street, N.W., and F Street, N.W., as ‘Where Lincoln’s Legacy Lives’ and orders that a street sign be placed at the intersection of 10th Street, N.W., and E Street, N.W., and at the intersection of 10th Street, N.W., and F Street, N.W., that reads ‘Where Lincoln’s Legacy Lives’.”

Designation of Hilda H.M. Mason Way: Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-163 provided:

“Sec. 2. Pursuant to sections 401 and 403a of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a) (‘Act’), and notwithstanding section 407 of the Act (D.C. Official Code § 9-204.07), the Council symbolically designates the 1400 block of Roxanna Road, N.W., as ‘Hilda H.M. Mason Way’.”

Designation of “Phebbie Scott Way”. Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-247 provided that pursuant to §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a, and notwithstanding §§ 9-204.05 and 9-204.07, the Council symbolically designates the 3900 block of Burns Place, S.E., in Ward 7, as “Phebbie Scott Way”.

Designation of “Senator Charles H. Percy Plaza”. Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-249 provided that pursuant to §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a, and notwithstanding §§ 9-204.05 and 9-204.07, the Council designates the intersection of Wisconsin Avenue, N.W., K Street, N.W., and Water Street, N.W., in Ward 2, as the “Senator Charles H. Percy Plaza”.

Designation of Albert “Butch” Hopkins Way. Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-250 provided that pursuant to §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a, and notwithstanding §§ 9-204.05 and 9-204.07) the Council symbolically designates the 1800 block of Martin Luther King Jr. Avenue, S.E., as “Albert ‘Butch’ Hopkins Way”.

Designation of Chuck Brown Park: Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-259 provided that pursuant to § 9-204.01, and notwithstanding §§ 9-204.05 and 9-204.07, the Council designates the western side of Langdon Park, between 18th Street, N.E., and 20th Street, N.E., in Ward 5, as “Chuck Brown Park”.

Designation of Greater Mount Calvary Way: Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-265 provided that pursuant to §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a), the Council symbolically designates the 600 block of Rhode Island Avenue, N.E., as “Greater Mount Calvary Way”.

Designation of David A. Clarke School of Law: Section 3 of D.C. Law 12-85 provided that pursuant to this section, the Council of the District of Columbia designates the UDC School of Connecticut Avenue, N.W., the David A. Clarke School of Law.

Delta Sigma Theta Way: Section 2 of D.C. Law 20-29 and D.C. Act 20-126 provided that the Council symbolically designates the 1700 block of New Hampshire Ave, N.W., in Ward 2, as “Delta Sigma Theta Way”.

Atlas Court: Section 2 of D.C. Law 20-30 provided that the Council designates the alley in Square 981 bordered by the 1100 blocks of H Street, N.E., and I Street, N.E., and the 800 blocks of 11th Street, N.E., and 12th Street, N.E., as “Atlas Court”.

Dimitar Peshev Plaza: Section 2 of D.C. Law 20-32 provided that the Council symbolically designates the intersection of 22nd and R Streets, N.W., in Ward 2, as “Dimitar Peshev Plaza”.

Designation of Annie’s Way: Section 2 of D.C. Law 20-99 provided that, pursuant to §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a, the Council symbolically designates the 1600 block of Church Street, N.W., between 17th Street, N.W., and Stead Park, in Ward 2, as “Annie’s Way”.

Designation of Belmont Park: Sections 2 and 3 of D.C. Law 20-106 provided that the Council designates the public right-of-way, west of Connecticut Ave., N.W., at the intersection of Connecticut Ave., N.W., and Belmont Road, N.W., shown on the Surveyor’s plat as adjacent to Lot 197, Square 2526, as “Belmont Park”. The newly designated Belmont Park is established as a public park and shall be maintained under the jurisdiction of the Department of Parks and Recreation.

Designation of Zion Baptist Church Way. Section 2 of D.C. Law 20-181 provided that pursuant to §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a, the Council symbolically designates the public alley in Square 2655, bounded by Colorado Avenue, N.W., and Blagden Avenue, N.W., in Ward 4, as “Zion Baptist Church Way”.

Designation of Bishop Iola B. Cunningham Way. Section 2 of D.C. Law 20-182 provided that pursuant to §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a, the Council symbolically designates Kenilworth Avenue, N.E., from Hayes Street, N.E., to Jay Street, N.E., in Ward 7, as “Bishop Iola B. Cunningham Way”.

Designation of Nap Turner Way. Section 2 of D.C. Law 20-184 provided that pursuant to §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a, the Council symbolically designates the portion of the public alley in Square 237 running from Wallach Place, N.W., to U Street, N.W., in Ward 1, as “Nap Turner Way”.

Designation of N Street Village Way. Section 2 of D.C. Law 20-187 provided that pursuant to §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a, the Council symbolically designates the 1300 block of N Street, N.W., between 14th Street, N.W., and Vermont Avenue, N.W., in Ward 2, as “N Street Village Way”.

Designation of Lawrence Guyot Way. Section 2 of D.C. Law 20-213 provided that pursuant to §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a, the Council symbolically designates U Street, N.W., between 5th Street, N.W., and 6th Street, N.W., in Ward 1, as “Lawrence Guyot Way”.

Designation of Percy Battle Way. Section 2 of D.C. Law 20-214 provided that pursuant to §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a, the Council symbolically designates the 1100 block of Chicago Street, S.E., between Martin Luther King, Jr. Avenue , S.E., and Railroad Avenue, S.E., in Ward 8, as “Percy Battle Way”.

Designation of Cashell Alley. Section 2 of D.C. Law 20-217 provided that pursuant to §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a, the Council symbolically designates the T-shaped alley in Square 1272 exiting onto Volta Place, N.W., in Ward 2, as “Cashell Alley”.

Designation of D.C. No Taxation Without Representation Way. Section 2 of D.C. Law 20-221 provided that pursuant to §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a, the Council symbolically designates 1st Street, N.E., and 1st Street, S.E., between Constitution Avenue, N.E., and Independence Avenue, S.E., in Ward 6, as “D.C. No Taxation Without Representation Way”.

Designation of Sonia Gutierrez Campus Way: Section 2 of D.C. Law 20-246 provided that, pursuant to §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a, the Council symbolically designates the 500 block of V Street, N.E., in Ward 5, as “Sonia Gutierrez Campus Way.”

Designation of Ruby Whitfield Way. Section 2 of D.C. Law 21-28 provided that the Council symbolically designates the 1100 block of Florida Avenue, N.E., as “Ruby Whitfield Way.”

Designation of Margaret Peters and Roumania Peters Walker Tennis Courts. Section 2 of D.C. Law 21-31 provided that the Council symbolically designates the tennis courts at Rose Park, located at 2600 O Street, N.W., in Ward 2, as the “Margaret Peters and Roumania Peters Walker Tennis Courts.”

Designation of James Bunn Way: Section 2 of D.C. Law 21-46 provided that, pursuant to §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.03a, the Council symbolically designates the 3100 block of Esther Place, S.E., in Ward 8, as “James Bunn Way.”